Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.286

Opportunity express account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1468-S.SL) ***

A separate and identifiable account, which shall be known as the opportunity express account, is established. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Moneys in the account shall be used only for the worker retraining program, training programs approved by the commissioner of the employment security department, training programs administered by labor and management partnerships, industry-prioritized training programs, training programs that facilitate career progression in health care occupations, the opportunity internship program, and the opportunity grant program, and for administrative costs related to these programs. Moneys in the account shall be used to supplement, not supplant, existing funding for the opportunity grant program.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 24 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2010 1st sp.s. c 24: See note following RCW 28C.04.390.